Wyoming, session 2026, HB0061.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 35-7-110(a) by creating a new
paragraph (xxxii) and by renumbering (xxxii) as (xxxiii),
35-7-111(a) by creating a new paragraph (xiv),
35-7-119(e)(ii) and 35-7-125(a) are amended to read:

35-7-110. Definitions.

(a) As used in this act:

HB0061

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0391
(xxxii) "Cultivated meat" means meat that is
grown entirely in a laboratory from cultured animal cells
rather than harvested from an animal. Cultured animal cells
includes cells collected from a living or recently
slaughtered animal which are grown for the purposes of
creating cultivated meat;

(xxxii)(xxxiii) "This act" means W.S. 35-7-109
through 35-7-126.

35-7-111. Prohibited acts.

(a) No person shall:

(xiv) Manufacture for sale, sell, offer for sale
or distribute for sale cultivated meat for human
consumption in this state.

35-7-119. Fair packaging and labeling provisions.

(e) The department shall promulgate rules with
respect to labeling. Every retailer and every wholesaler
HB0061

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0391
who sells or offers for sale in this state through an
establishment or otherwise any:

(ii) Cell cultured products, cultivated
meat not intended for human consumption, or plant based
products not consistent with the definition of meat in
subparagraph (vi)(A) of this subsection and not derived
from harvested livestock, poultry, wildlife or exotic
livestock as those terms are defined in W.S. 11-26-101(a),
11-32-101(a)(iv), 23-1-101(a)(xiii) and 23-1-102(a)(xvi),
shall clearly label cell cultured products as "containing
cell cultured product" and clearly label plant based
products as "vegetarian", "veggie", "vegan", "plant based"
or other similar term indicating that the product is plant
based;

35-7-125. Summary suspension of a license.

(a) A regulatory authority may summarily suspend a
license to operate a food establishment if it determines
through consultation with a health officer, inspection,
examination of food, employees, records or other authorized
means that an imminent health hazard exists including, but
HB0061

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0391
not limited to, fire, flood, extended interruption of
electrical or water service, or sewage backup, or that an
establishment is manufacturing for sale, selling, offering
for sale or distributing for sale cultivated meat for human
consumption.

Section 2. The department of agriculture shall
promulgate all rules necessary to implement this act.

Section 3.

(a) Except as otherwise provided by subsection (b) of
this section, this act is effective July 1, 2026.

(b) Sections 2 and 3 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.

(END)
HB0061